Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.310

Time limit for claiming service credit—Payments.

(1) Any member desiring to establish credit for services previously rendered, must present proof and make the necessary payments on or before June 30 of the fifth school year of membership. Payments covering all types of membership service credit must be made in a lump sum when due, or in annual installments. The first annual installment of at least twenty percent of the amount due must be paid before the above deadline date, and the final payment must be made by June 30th of the fourth school year following that in which the first installment was made. The amount of payment and the interest thereon, whether lump sum or installments, shall be made by a method and in an amount established by the department.

(2) A member who had the opportunity under chapter 41.32 RCW prior to July 1, 1969, to establish credit for active United States military service or credit for professional preparation and failed to do so shall be permitted to establish additional credit within the provisions of RCW 41.32.260 and 41.32.330. A member who was not permitted to establish credit pursuant to section 2, chapter 32, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess., for Washington teaching service previously rendered, must present proof and make the necessary payment to establish such credit as membership service credit. Payment for such credit must be made in a lump sum on or before June 30, 1974. Any member desiring to establish credit under the provisions of this subsection must present proof and make the necessary payment before June 30, 1974; or, if not employed on the effective date of this amendment, before June 30th of the fifth school year upon returning to public school employment in this state.

(3) After June 30th of the fifth school year of membership, any member desiring to establish credit for services previously rendered, must present proof and make the necessary payments under RCW 41.50.165(2) but prior to retirement.

[ 1994 c 197 s 15; 1992 c 72 s 6. Prior: 1991 c 35 s 43; 1974 ex.s. c 193 s 1; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 9; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 8; 1955 c 274 s 12; 1947 c 80 s 31; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-50.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Emergency—1974 ex.s. c 193: "This amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately." [ 1974 ex.s. c 193 s 10.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 193: "If any provision of this amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 193 s 9.]

Emergency—1973 2nd ex.s. c 32: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately." [ 1973 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 7.]

Severability—1973 2nd ex.s. c 32: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 6.]

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.